Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB528.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.* * *(c) Officers, employees, etc., enumerated.--The officers, agents, employees and other persons referred to in subsection (a) shall be as follows:* * *(40) A county commissioner.(41) A member of a county council.(42) A mayor.(43) A member of a municipal council.* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0528PN0501 - 2 - 1